Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 63.
FOUR YEAR TERMS FOR STATE CONSTITUTIONAL OFFICERS.

§ 1. Executive Department — Term of office.

The Executive Department of this State shall consist of a Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, Attorney General and Commissioner of State Lands, all of whom shall keep their offices at the seat of government, and hold their offices for the term of four (4) years, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by initiative petition and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on July 2, 1984. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 6, 1984, by a vote of 499,083 for and 277,735 against.

This amendment probably supersedes Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 1; Ark. Const. Amend. 6, § 1; and Ark. Const. Amend. 56, § 1.

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 63, § 2: effective Jan. 1, 1987, and applicable to officers elected at the 1986 general election and thereafter.